Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.04
Delayed birth certificate; persons applying.

In order to request the issuance of a certificate of delayed birth registration, the applicant shall be at least eighteen years of age. If the applicant is not yet eighteen years of age, application may be made only by the applicant's father, mother, guardian, or attendant at birth.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 11.